Oklahoma, session 2026, SB658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-8-113 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services shall not:
1. Require any current or prospective adoptive or foster parent
to affirm, accept, or support any government policy regarding sexual
orientation or gender identity that conflicts with the parent’s
sincerely held religious or moral beliefs as a condition for
eligibility to adopt or foster;
2. Deny a current or prospective adoptive or foster parent any
authorization necessary to be eligible to adopt or foster based, in
whole or in part, upon the parent’s sincerely held religious or
moral beliefs, or intent to guide, instruct, or raise a child
consistent with those beliefs, regarding sexual orientation or
gender identity; or

3. Establish or enforce any standard, rule, or policy that
precludes consideration of a current or prospective adoptive or
foster parent for any particular placement based, in whole or in
part, upon the parent’s sincerely held religious or moral beliefs
regarding sexual orientation or gender identity.
B. Nothing in this section shall:
1. Preclude the Department from taking into account the
religious or moral beliefs of a particular adoptive or foster child,
or his or her family of origin including, but not limited to, the
child’s or family’s views regarding sexual orientation and gender
identity, considered in relation to the religious or moral beliefs
of a prospective adoptive or foster parent when determining which
placement is in the best interest of the child; or
2. Be construed to prohibit or relieve the Department of its
duty to make each placement consistent with the best interests of
the child as otherwise required by law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 658 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 26th day of February, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 658 Page 3